zh-CN: 包含的浴室配件: 棉花罐; 漱口杯; 乳液瓶; 肥皂盒; 皂液器; 纸巾盒套; 马桶刷架; 卫生纸架/卷纸架; 毛巾杆; 毛巾环; 托盘; 平底杯; 废纸篓; 其他
da: Badeværelsestilbehør medfølger: Bomuldskrukke; Kop; Lotiondispenser; Sæbeskål; Sæbedispenser; Låg til servietæske; Toiletbørsteholder; Toiletrulleholder; Håndklædestang; Håndklædering; Bakke; Tumbler; Skraldespand; Andet
ro-RO: Accesorii pentru baie incluse: Borcan pentru bumbac; Cană; Dozator de loțiune; Savonieră; Dozator de săpun; Capac pentru cutia de șervețele; Suport pentru perie de toaletă; Suport pentru hârtie igienică; Bară de prosop; Inel de prosop; Tavă; Pahar; Coș de gunoi; Altele
cs: Obsažené koupelnové doplňky: Nádobka na bavlněné tampony; Kelímek; Dávkovač krému; Miska na mýdlo; Dávkovač mýdla; Box na kapesníky; Držák WC kartáče; Držák na toaletní papír; Tyč na ručníky; Kroužek na ručník; Podnos/tác; Sklenice/pohárek; Odpadkový koš; Jiné
es: Accesorios para el baño incluidos: Bote para algodón; Taza; Dispensador de loción; Jabonera; Dispensador de jabón; Tapa de caja de pañuelos; Escobillero; Portarrollos; Toallero de barra; Toallero de aro; Bandeja; Vaso; Papelera; Otros
hr-HR: Uključeni dodaci za kupaonicu: Staklenka za vatu; Kup; Dozator losiona; Posudica za sapun; Dozator za sapun; Poklopac kutije za maramice; Držač WC četke; Držač toaletnog papira; Šipka za ručnik; Kolut za ručnik; Pladanj; Čaša s ravnim dnom; Košara za otpatke; Ostalo
pt-PT: Acessórios de casa de banho incluídos: Frasco de algodão; Copo; Dispensador de loção; Saboneteira; Dispensador de sabonete; Capa para caixa de lenços de papel; Suporte para piaçaba; Suporte para papel higiénico; Toalheiro; Toalheiro redondo; Bandeja; Copo para escova de dentes; Cesto do lixo; Outro
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари за баня: Буркан за памук; Чаша; Диспенсър за лосион; Чинийка за сапун; Диспенсър за сапун; Декоративна кутия за салфетки; Поставка за тоалетни четки; Поставка за тоалетна хартия; Поставка тип лост за кърпи; Поставка тип пръстен за кърпи; Тава; Чаша без дръжка и без столче; Кошче за отпадъци; Друго
zh-TW: 浴室配件包含項目: 棉花罐; 杯子; 乳液分配機; 肥皂盤; 給皂機; 衛生紙盒套; 馬桶刷座; 捲筒衛生紙架; 毛巾桿; 毛巾掛環; 托架; 漱口杯; 垃圾桶; 其他
hu: Mellékelt fürdőszobai kiegészítők: Vattaüveg; Pohár; Testápoló adagoló; Szappantartó; Szappanadagoló; Zsebkendőtartó fedél; Vécékefetartó; Vécépapírtartó; Törülközőtartó rúd; Törülközőtartó gyűrű; Tálca; Pohár; Szemeteskosár; Egyéb
ru: Набор аксессуаров для ванной комнаты: Банка для ваты; Стакан; Дозатор лосьона; Мыльница; Дозатор для мыла; Крышка коробки для салфеток; Подставка для туалетных ершиков; Держатель для туалетной бумаги; Штанга для полотенец; Кольцо для полотенец; Поднос; Стакан для зубных щеток; Мусорная корзина; Другое
vi: Phụ kiện phòng tắm đi kèm: Hũ đựng bông; Cốc; Bình đựng sữa tắm; Khay đựng xà phòng; Bình đựng xà phòng; Hộp đựng khăn giấy; Kệ đỡ cọ toilet; Đồ đựng giấy vệ sinh; Thanh treo khăn; Vòng treo khăn; Khay; Cốc không quai; Giỏ đựng rác; Khác
pl: Akcesoria łazienkowe w zestawie: Słoik na waciki; Kubek; Dozownik do balsamu; Mydelniczka; Dozownik do mydła; Pokrowiec na pudełko chusteczek; Uchwyt na szczotkę do toalety; Uchwyt na papier toaletowy; Wieszak na ręcznik; Wieszak-kółko na ręczniki; Tacka; Kubek łazienkowy; Kosz na śmieci; Pozostałe
en: Bathroom accessories included: Cotton jar; Cup; Lotion dispenser; Soap dish; Soap dispenser; Tissue box cover; Toilet brush holder; Toilet paper holder; Towel bar; Towel ring; Tray; Tumbler; Wastebasket; Other
ja: バスルームアクセサリー付属: コットン入れ; カップ; ローションディスペンサー; ソープディッシュ; ソープディスペンサー; ティッシュボックスカバー; トイレブラシホルダー; トイレットペーパーホルダー; タオル掛け; タオルリング; トレイ; タンブラー; ゴミ箱; その他
tr: Dahil olan banyo aksesuarları: Pamuk kavanozu; Bardak; Losyonluk; Sabunluk; Pompalı sıvı sabunluk; Mendil kutusu kapağı; Tuvalet fırçası tutuculsu; Tuvalet kağıdı tutucusu; Havlu asma çubuğu; Havlu halkası; Tepsi; Bardak; Çöp sepeti; Diğer
fr: Contenu du kit d’accessoires de salle de bains: Pot à coton; Tasse; Distributeur de lotion; Porte-savon; Distributeur de savon; Couvercle de boîte à mouchoirs; Porte-brosse de toilettes; Distributeur de papier hygiénique; Barre porte-serviette; Anneau porte-serviette; Plateau; Gobelet; Corbeille à déchets; Autre
ko: 욕실 액세서리 세트 포함 품목: 면봉통; 컵; 로션 디스펜서; 비누 받침대; 비누 디스펜서; 티슈 상자 덮개; 변기솔 홀더; 화장실 휴지걸이; 수건걸이; 수건 고리; 트레이; 텀블러; 망 휴지통; 기타
de: Enthaltene Badezimmeraccessoire: Watteglas; Schale; Lotionspender; Seifenschale; Seifenspender; Taschentuchbox-Hülle; Toilettenbürstenhalter; Toilettenpapierhalter; Handtuchstange; Handtuchring; Tablett; Trinkglas; Abfalleimer; Sonstiges
el: Περιλαμβανόμενα αξεσουάρ μπάνιου: Βάζο για βαμβάκι; Κύπελλο; Διανομέας λοσιόν; Σαπουνοθήκη; Διανομέας σαπουνιού; Κάλυμμα κουτιού χαρτομάντιλων; Θήκη βούρτσας τουαλέτας; Θήκη χαρτιού υγείας; Ράγα πετσετών; Κρίκος πετσετών; Δίσκος; Κύπελλο; Καλάθια απορριμμάτων; Άλλο
it: Accessori da bagno inclusi: Barattolo per cotone; Coppa; Dispenser per lozione; Portasapone; Dispenser per sapone; Coperchio della scatola dei fazzoletti; Portascopino; Porta carta igienica; Portasciugamani a barra; Portasciugamani ad anello; Vassoio; Tumbler; Cestino per rifiuti; Altro
nb: Inkludert baderomstilbehør: Bomullskrukke; Kopp; Lotiondispenser; Såpeskål; Såpedispenser; Deksel til lommetørklær; Toalettbørsteholder; Toalettpapirholder; Håndklestang; Håndklering; Brett; Tørketrommel; Søppelkurver; Annet
sk-SK: Kúpeľňové doplnky sú súčasťou balenia: Nádoba na vatové tampóny; Pohár; Dávkovač pleťového mlieka; Miska na mydlo; Dávkovač mydla; Škatuľka na vreckovky; Držiaky na WC kefy; Držiak na toaletný papier; Tyč na uteráky; Krúžok na uteráky; Podnos; Pohár; Odpadkový kôš; Iné
fi: Sisältyvät kylpyhuonetarvikkeet: Vanupurkki; Muki; Voideannostelija; Saippua-astia; Pumppuannostelija; Nenäliinalaatikon kotelo; Vessaharjan pidike; Vessapaperiteline; Pyyhetanko; Pyyhekoukku; Tarjotin; Juomalasi; Roskakori; Muu
lt-LT: Vonios kambario priedai komplekte: Vatos indelis; Puodelis; Losjono dozatorius; Muilinė; Muilo dozatorius; Servetėlių dėžutės dangtelis; Tualeto šepečio laikiklis; Tualetinio popieriaus laikiklis; Rankšluosčių turėklas; Rankšluosčių žiedas; Padėklas; Stiklinė; Nedidelė šiukšliadėžė; Kita
nl: Inbegrepen badkameraccessoires: Wattenpot; Kom; Lotiondispenser; Zeepbakje; Zeepdispenser; Tissuedooshoes; Toiletborstelhouder; Toiletpapierhouder; Handdoekstang; Handdoekring; Schaaltje; Beker; Prullenmand; Overig
th: อุปกรณ์ห้องน้ำที่รวมอยู่ในชุด: กระปุกใส่สำลี; ถ้วย; ขวดปั๊มโลชั่น; ที่วางสบู่; ที่กดสบู่; ที่ครอบกล่องทิชชู; ที่ใส่แปรงขัดห้องน้ำ; ที่ใส่กระดาษชำระ; ราวแขวนผ้าเช็ดตัว; ห่วงแขวนผ้าเช็ดตัว; ถาดวางของ; แก้วน้ำ; ตะกร้าขยะ; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Priloženi kopalniški dodatki: Bombažna posoda; Čaša; Dozirnik losjona; Mila; Podajalnik mila; Pokrov škatle za robčke; Držala za straniščne ščetke; Držalo za toaletni papir; Drog za brisače; Obroč za brisačo; Pladenj; Potovalni lonček; Koši za smeti; Druga
pt-BR: Acessórios de banheiro incluídos: Porta-algodão; Copo; Dispensador de loção; Saboneteira; Dispensador de sabonete; Capa para caixa de lenços de papel; Porta-escova sanitária; Porta-papel higiênico; Barra para toalhas; Argola para toalha; Bandeja; Porta-escovas; Lixeira; Outro
sv: Badrumstillbehör som ingår: bomullsburk; Kopp; Lotiondispenser; Tvålfat; Tvålpump; Näsduksasköverdrag; Toalettborsthållare; Toalettpappershållare; Handdukshängare; Handduksring; Bricka; Mugg; Papperskorgar; Övrigt